Texas, session 891, SB60.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 141.009, Health and Safety Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 141.009.  STANDARDS. The executive commissioner by rule shall establish health and safety standards for youth camps. The standards may relate to: (1)  adequate and proper supervision at all times of camp activities; (2)  qualifications for directors, supervisors, and staff and sufficient numbers of those persons; (3)  proper safeguards for sanitation and public health; (4)  adequate medical services for personal health and first aid; (5)  proper procedures for food preparation, handling, and mass feeding; (6)  healthful and sufficient water supply; (7)  proper waste disposal; (8)  proper water safety procedures for swimming pools, lakes, and waterways; (9)  safe boating equipment; (10)  proper maintenance and safe use of motor vehicles; (11)  safe buildings and physical facilities; (12)  proper fire and flood precautions; (13)  safe and proper recreational and other equipment; (14)  proper regard for density and use of the premises; and (15)  records of criminal convictions of camp personnel. SECTION 2.  Chapter 141, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 141.0091 to read as follows: Sec. 141.0091.  EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS AND SAFETY REQUIREMENTS. (a)  The department may not issue or renew a license for a youth camp under this chapter unless the youth camp operator provides to the department documentation showing the camp: (1)  maintains operable radios capable of providing real-time weather alerts issued by the National Weather Service or a similar professional weather service in each camp facility in which the camp provides overnight accommodations; (2)  installs and maintains at the camp an emergency warning system that: (A)  is capable of alerting all campers and camp occupants of an emergency; and (B)  includes a public address system operable without reliance on an Internet connection; (3)  monitors safety alerts issued: (A)  by the National Weather Service or a similar professional weather service; and (B)  by local river authorities or through other local emergency notification systems; (4)  adopts a written emergency preparedness plan detailing: (A)  evacuation and transportation procedures; (B)  muster zones; and (C)  the location and proper use of available emergency equipment, including: (i)  items for extinguishing fires; (ii)  beacons; (iii)  flotation devices; and (iv)  any other emergency equipment required by department rules; (5)  provides the emergency preparedness plan described by Subdivision (4) to and obtains approval from the local agency responsible for providing emergency response services for the camp; (6)  provides a weekly notification to the local agency described by Subdivision (5) of the number of campers and other occupants present at the camp for that week; (7)  designates as an emergency preparedness supervisor a staff member for the camp; and (8)  conducts appropriate safety drills during each camp session. (b)  The executive commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section. SECTION 3.  As soon as possible after the effective date of this Act, the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement Section 141.009, Health and Safety Code, as amended by this Act, and Section 141.0091, Health and Safety Code, as added by this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.